Alaska, session 34, SB122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 21.07 is amended by adding a new section to read: 05 Sec. 21.07.035. Minimum provider network standards. (a) A health care 06 insurer shall take the network requirements of this section into account when 07 calculating the benefits of, or other contractual requirements applicable to, a covered 08 person's health care insurance policy that, as determined by the director, 09 (1) requires the covered person to use a limited network of health care 10 providers, as defined in regulation by the director; or 11 (2) creates a substantial financial or other incentive or disincentive for 12 the covered person to use a limited network of health care providers. 13 (b) A health care insurer's provider network must include each hospital, 14 skilled nursing facility, or mental health or substance abuse facility licensed in the 01 state and each physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse 02 licensed in this state who is employed or contracted by one of these hospitals or 03 facilities to provide medical care at the hospital or facility. A health care insurer's 04 provider network must include each health care facility operated by an Alaska tribal 05 health organization and each physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice 06 registered nurse employed or contracted by the organization to provide medical care at 07 that location. A physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse 08 who is employed or contracted by a hospital, skilled nursing facility, mental health or 09 substance abuse facility, or Alaska tribal health organization to provide medical care is 10 not included when calculating the health care insurer's minimum network standards set 11 out in (d) of this section. 12 (c) A health care insurer's provider network must include a sufficient number 13 of physicians, physician assistants, and advanced practice registered nurses in each 14 contracting region in which the insurer provides coverage to meet the minimum 15 network standards set out in (d) of this section. Only a physician, physician assistant, 16 or advanced practice registered nurse who is licensed in this state, meets the 17 credentialling standards of the health care insurer, and whose principal practice 18 location is physically located in the applicable contracting region may be included 19 when determining whether a health care insurer meets the minimum network standards 20 set out in (d) of this section. If an insurer treats the physician, physician assistant, or 21 advanced practice registered nurse as contracted for the purposes of all insurance 22 benefit determinations, a health care insurer may include in the provider network a 23 physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse who is not a 24 contracted network health care provider to meet the standards set out in (d) of this 25 section. Each physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse 26 included in the health care insurer's provider network, including a physician, physician 27 assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse that is not a contracted network health 28 care provider, must be shown as an in-network provider in the insurer's directory of 29 network providers. 30 (d) For purposes of this section, the state is divided into six contracting 31 regions: the Municipality of Anchorage; the Matanuska-Susitna Borough; the 01 Fairbanks North Star Borough and Southeast Fairbanks Census Area; the Kenai 02 Peninsula Borough; the City and Borough of Juneau, Ketchikan Gateway Borough, 03 and City and Borough of Sitka; and the remainder of the state. A health care insurer 04 that provides coverage in the Municipality of Anchorage contracting region must 05 include in the insurer's provider network at least 70 percent of the total actively 06 practicing physicians, physician assistants, and advanced practice registered nurses in 07 each specialty recognized for a Medicare advantage plan network adequacy 08 requirement for the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services physically located in 09 the region and at least 70 percent of the provider groups in each specialty. A health 10 care insurer that provides coverage in the Matanuska-Susitna Borough contracting 11 region or the Fairbanks North Star Borough and Southeast Fairbanks Census Area 12 contracting region must include in the insurer's provider network at least 75 percent of 13 the total actively practicing physicians, physician assistants, and advanced practice 14 registered nurses in each specialty recognized for a Medicare advantage plan network 15 adequacy requirement for the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services physically 16 located in those regions and at least 75 percent of the provider groups in each 17 specialty. A health care insurer that provides coverage in the Kenai Peninsula Borough 18 contracting region, the City and Borough of Juneau, Ketchikan Gateway Borough, and 19 City and Borough of Sitka contracting region, or the contracting region covering the 20 remainder of the state must include in the insurer's provider network at least 80 21 percent of the total actively practicing physicians, physician assistants, and advanced 22 practice registered nurses in each specialty recognized for a Medicare advantage plan 23 network adequacy requirement for the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services 24 physically located in those regions and at least 80 percent of the provider groups in 25 each specialty. 26 (e) A health care insurer may make a written request to the director for an 27 exception to the minimum provider network standards set out under this section. The 28 director may grant an exception only for a specified limited period not to exceed 36 29 months. The director shall adopt regulations specifying the procedure for requesting 30 an exception and the standards for granting an exception. The director shall require the 31 health care insurer to submit a plan to achieve the minimum network standards within 01 the time frame of the exception granted by the director and submit annual progress 02 reports to the director. 03 (f) A health care insurer shall annually attest whether the insurer meets or 04 exceeds the minimum provider network standards in this section for each contracting 05 region in which the insurer provides coverage and provide to the director supporting 06 documentation to demonstrate compliance as part of the insurer's required rate filings. 07 If a health care insurer does not meet a specific standard, the insurer shall submit a 08 plan for corrective action for consideration by the director. 09 (g) The director may adopt regulations necessary to implement this section. 10 The director may adopt in regulation minimum provider network standards by 11 contracting region that exceed the minimum network standards set out in (d) of this 12 section. 13 * Sec. 2. AS 21.07.020(3) is repealed. 14 * Sec. 3. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.